Utah statutes.
70A-4a-201.   Security procedure.

(1)  "Security procedure" means a procedure established by agreement of a customer and a receiving bank for the purpose of:

(a)  verifying that a payment order or communication amending or canceling a payment order is that of the customer; or

(b)  detecting error in the transmission or the content of the payment order or communication.

(2)  A security procedure may require the use of algorithms or other codes, identifying words or numbers, encryption, callback procedures, or similar security devices.  Comparison of a signature on a payment order or communication with an authorized specimen signature of the customer is not by itself a security procedure.



Enacted by Chapter 294, 1990 General Session

